SpellChecking/Dictionaries/latin persian.aff
#Language: Persian
#Script: Alefbā-ye 2om <alefbaye2om.org> (2nd Persian Alphabet), a transcription standard for the Persian language
#Accuracy & completeness: beta-version-like, expecting to cover over 90% of general texts 
#Suggestions to: <h.farroukh@yahoo.de>
#Author: Hamid Farroukh
#Version: 1.0.2
#License: CC BY-SA 

SET UTF-8
WORDCHARS 0123456789'’


#Conjunction with e (ezāfe)
SFX e Y 5
SFX e   0     -e         [^']
SFX e   0     -e         [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX e   '     -e         [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX e   w     v-e        ow
SFX e   0     -ye        [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]

#Indefinitness (nakare)
SFX i Y 15
SFX i   0     -i/o       [^']
SFX i   0     -i/o       [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX i   '     -i/o       [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX i   w     v-i/o      ow
SFX i   0     -yi/o      [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX i   0     -i/p       [^']
SFX i   0     -i/p       [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX i   '     -i/p       [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX i   w     v-i/p      ow
SFX i   0     -yi/p      [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX i   0     -i/b       [^']
SFX i   0     -i/b       [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX i   '     -i/b       [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX i   w     v-i/b      ow
SFX i   0     -yi/b      [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]

#Conjunction with o (atf)
SFX o Y 6
SFX o   0     -o         [^']
SFX o   0     -o         [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX o   '     -o         [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX o   w     v-o        ow
SFX o   0     -yo        i
SFX o   0     -vo        [a,ā,e,o,u]

#Exclamation (nedā)
SFX a Y 6
SFX a   0     -ā         [^']
SFX a   0     -ā         [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX a   '     -ā         [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX a   w     v-ā        ow
SFX a   0     -yā        [ā,i,u]
SFX a   0     -vā        [e,o]

#Abbreviated forms of to be (surat-e moxaffaf-e budan am/i/ast/im/id/and)
SFX b Y 30
SFX b   0     -am/o      [^']
SFX b   0     -am/o      [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX b   '     -am/o      [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX b   w     v-am/o     ow
SFX b   0     -yam/o     [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX b   0     -i/o       [^']
SFX b   0     -i/o       [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX b   '     -i/o       [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX b   w     v-i/o      ow
SFX b   0     -yi/o      [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX b   0     -ast/o     [^']
SFX b   0     -ast/o     [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX b   '     -ast/o     [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX b   w     v-ast/o    ow
SFX b   0     -st/o      [ā,i,o,u,ow]
SFX b   0     -im/o      [^']
SFX b   0     -im/o      [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX b   '     -im/o      [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX b   w     v-im/o     ow
SFX b   0     -yim/o     [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX b   0     -id/o      [^']
SFX b   0     -id/o      [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX b   '     -id/o      [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX b   w     v-id/o     ow
SFX b   0     -yid/o     [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX b   0     -and/o     [^']
SFX b   0     -and/o     [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX b   '     -and/o     [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX b   w     v-and/o    ow
SFX b   0     -yand/o    [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]

#Possessive and objective pronouns (zamirhā-ye mottasel)
SFX p Y 60
SFX p   0     -am/o      [^']
SFX p   0     -am/o      [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   '     -am/o      [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   w     v-am/o     ow
SFX p   0     -yam/o     [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX p   0     -am/b      [^']
SFX p   0     -am/b      [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   '     -am/b      [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   w     v-am/b     ow
SFX p   0     -yam/b     [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX p   0     -at/o      [^']
SFX p   0     -at/o      [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   '     -at/o      [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   w     v-at/o     ow
SFX p   0     -yat/o     [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX p   0     -at/b      [^']
SFX p   0     -at/b      [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   '     -at/b      [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   w     v-at/b     ow
SFX p   0     -yat/b     [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX p   0     -aš/o      [^']
SFX p   0     -aš/o      [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   '     -aš/o      [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   w     v-aš/o     ow
SFX p   0     -yaš/o     [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX p   0     -aš/b      [^']
SFX p   0     -aš/b      [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   '     -aš/b      [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   w     v-aš/b     ow
SFX p   0     -yaš/b     [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX p   0     -emān/o    [^']
SFX p   0     -emān/o    [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   '     -emān/o    [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   w     v-emān/o   ow
SFX p   0     -yemān/o   [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX p   0     -emān/b    [^']
SFX p   0     -emān/b    [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   '     -emān/b    [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   w     v-emān/b   ow
SFX p   0     -yemān/b   [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX p   0     -etān/o    [^']
SFX p   0     -etān/o    [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   '     -etān/o    [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   w     v-etān/o   ow
SFX p   0     -yetān/o   [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX p   0     -etān/b    [^']
SFX p   0     -etān/b    [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   '     -etān/b    [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   w     v-etān/b   ow
SFX p   0     -yetān/b   [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX p   0     -ešān/o    [^']
SFX p   0     -ešān/o    [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   '     -ešān/o    [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   w     v-ešān/o   ow
SFX p   0     -yešān/o   [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX p   0     -ešān/b    [^']
SFX p   0     -ešān/b    [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   '     -ešān/b    [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX p   w     v-ešān/b   ow
SFX p   0     -yešān/b   [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]

#The derivative suffix i making nouns (esmsāz)
SFX x Y 49
SFX x   0     i/o        [^',e]
SFX x   0     i/o        [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX x   '     i/o        [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX x   w     vi/o       ow
SFX x   ow   avi/o     ow
SFX x   0     gi/o       e
SFX x   0     yi/o       [ā,i,o,u,ow]
SFX x   0     i/e        [^',e]
SFX x   0     i/e        [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX x   '     i/e        [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX x   w     vi/e       ow
SFX x   ow   avi/e     ow
SFX x   0     gi/e       e
SFX x   0     yi/e       [ā,i,o,u,ow]
SFX x   0     i/i        [^',e]
SFX x   0     i/i        [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX x   '     i/i        [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX x   w     vi/i       ow
SFX x   ow   avi/i     ow
SFX x   0     gi/i       e
SFX x   0     yi/i       [ā,i,o,u,ow]
SFX x   0     i/b        [^',e]
SFX x   0     i/b        [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX x   '     i/b        [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX x   w     vi/b       ow
SFX x   ow   avi/b     ow
SFX x   0     gi/b       e
SFX x   0     yi/b       [ā,i,o,u,ow]
SFX x   0     i/p        [^',e]
SFX x   0     i/p        [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX x   '     i/p        [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX x   w     vi/p       ow
SFX x   ow   avi/p     ow
SFX x   0     gi/p       e
SFX x   0     yi/p       [ā,i,o,u,ow]
SFX x   0     i/h        [^',e]
SFX x   0     i/h        [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX x   '     i/h        [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX x   w     vi/h       ow
SFX x   ow   avi/h     ow
SFX x   0     gi/h       e
SFX x   0     yi/h       [ā,i,o,u,ow]
SFX x   0     i/ā        [^',e]
SFX x   0     i/ā        [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX x   '     i/ā        [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX x   w     vi/ā       ow
SFX x   ow   avi/ā     ow
SFX x   0     gi/ā       e
SFX x   0     yi/ā       [ā,i,o,u,ow]
