SpellChecking/Dictionaries/latin persian.dic
ābgiri/aābehiopx
abrukamān/aābehiopxycs
ādamrobāyi/aābehiopx
afsānepardāzi/aābehiopx
ahammiyat/aābehiopx
ajnās/aābehiopx
alamdāri/aābehiopx
āluce/aābehiopx
ammāmepic/aābehiopx
anbiyā/aābehiopx
angoštbor/aābehiopx
aqabnešini/aābehiopx
ārāmeštalabi/aābehiopx
ark/aābehiopx
arzešgerāyi/aābehiopx
āšekār/aābehiopxycs
aslahedār/aābehiopx
āšubzade/aābehiopxycs
atrāfi/aābehiopxycs
axlāqan/aābehiopx
āZA/aābehiopx
azimatgāh/aābehiopx
Bābel/aābehiopx
baddini/aābehiopx
badxābi/aābehiopx
bahremandi/aābehiopx
bālistiki/aābehiopxycs
bannāyi/aābehiopx
Barbar/aābehiopx
bārikšāxak/aābehiopx
barreside/aābehiopxycs
bastar/aābehiopx
bayānšode/aābehiopxycs
bāznagošāde/aābehiopxycs
bedastāvarde/aābehiopxycs
behruz/aābehiopxycs
beqāyat/aābehiopx
bevojudāmade/aābehiopxycs
biāri/aābehiopx
biemzā/aābehiopxycs
bihuši/aābehiopx
bimonāsebat/aābehiopxycs
birangobu/aābehiopxycs
bistsāle/aābehiopxycs
biyābānzodāyi/aābehiopx
bolond/aābehiopxycs
borrā/aābehiopxycs
bozorgdāšt/aābehiopx
Cād/aābehiopx
cāknāy/aābehiopx
candom/aābehiopxycs
cāqu/aābehiopx
cāvoš/aābehiopxycs
cemowqe'/aābehiopx
cinedān/aābehiopx
dabelnā/aābehiopx
dāhiyāne/aābehiopxycs
damidan/aābehiopxnPV
daqiqei/aābehiopxQ
darham/aābehiopxycs
darsāmuxte/aābehiopxycs
daryuzegari/aābehiopx
Dastjerd/aābehiopx
davidan/aābehiopxnPV
delāgāh/aābehiopxycs
demokrāti/aābehiopx
didgāh/aābehiopx
disko/aābehiopx
dodar/aābehiopxycs
donbālerow/aābehiopxycs
došekli/aābehiopx
dozabāne/aābehiopx
dusti/aābehiopx
edārekonande/aābehiopxycs
ehsāni/aābehiopx
ekmāli/aābehiopxycs
elm/aābehiopx
emtenān/aābehiopx
enšā'/aābehiopx
enzebāti/aābehiopxycs
erāyekonande/aābehiopxycs
esfanji/aābehiopxycs
Esmāil/aābehiopx
eštebāhāmiz/aābehiopxycs
estemzāj/aābehiopx
estez'āf/aābehiopx
etqān/aābehiopx
eynan/aābehiopx
fāez/aābehiopx
fanar/aābehiopx
farāmelliyati/aābehiopxycs
fārenhāyt/aābehiopx
farroxbaxš/aābehiopxycs
fasli/aābehiopxycs
fāzelāb/aābehiopx
fer/aābehiopx
fetneāfarin/aābehiopxycs
fistul/aābehiopx
forunešānde/aābehiopxycs
foyuz/aābehiopx
gāme/aābehiopxQ
garmābari/aābehiopx
gāzoili/aābehiopxycs
gerdrāh/aābehiopx
giyāhšenās/aābehiopx
golkārišode/aābehiopxycs
gonokok/aābehiopx
govāh/aābehiopx
guril/aābehiopx
hadāyā/aābehiopx
hāgdān/aābehiopx
hālivudi/aābehiopxycs
hamdars/aābehiopxycs
hamkelāsi/aābehiopx
hamsāl/aābehiopxycs
Hānri/aābehiopx
harbār/aābehiopx
hasbe/aābehiopx
hattākāne/aābehiopx
hāzerdarsahne/aābehiopxycs
hektār/aābehiopx
Herqol/aābehiopx
hezārmāyli/aābehiopxycs
hirovir/aābehiopx
Hongkong/aābehiopx
howzei/aābehiopxycs
imāyi/aābehiopxycs
istgāh/aābehiopx
jāduyi/aābehiopxycs
Jahromifar/aābehiopx
jāmeešenās/aābehiopx
jangsālār/aābehiopxycs
jāzebiyat/aābehiopx
jensiyat/aābehiopx
jojan/aābehiopx
kabud/aābehiopxycs
kālambār/aābehiopx
kamkālori/aābehiopxycs
kārāfarin/aābehiopxycs
kārxāne/aābehiopx
ke/aābehiopx
ketābforuš/aābehiopx
koleksiyon/aābehiopx
korkdār/aābehiopxycs
kurepazi/aābehiopx
lāl/aābehiopxycs
lāyanhal/aābehiopxycs
Losānjeles/aābehiopx
mādexuk/aābehiopx
mahmel/aābehiopx
malāmatgari/aābehiopx
manfibāf/aābehiopxycs
marazi/aābehiopxycs
masāeb/aābehiopx
Māstrixt/aābehiopx
ma'zeratxāhi/aābehiopx
menba'd/aābehiopx
milimetremoka''ab/aābehiopx
miyānin/aābehiopxycs
modāfeāt/aābehiopx
Mohebbiniyā/aābehiopx
monādi/aābehiopx
moqātee/aābehiopx
mosajjal/aābehiopxycs
mostaqellāt/aābehiopx
motenāveban/aābehiopx
mowkeb/aābehiopx
muryāne/aābehiopx
naderaxšānide/aābehiopxycs
nahāvandi/aābehiopxycs
nāma'nus/aābehiopxycs
napālāyide/aābehiopxycs
nāresānā/aābehiopxycs
nāštā/aābehiopxycs
nāxodā/aābehiopx
nedādahande/aābehiopxycs
neyrangestān/aābehiopx
nimezirzamini/aābehiopxycs
novel/aābehiopx
Odise/aābehiopx
orfan/aābehiopx
owsaj/aābehiopx
pālmitikasid/aābehiopx
pārāzit/aābehiopx
parvāri/aābehiopxycs
pāyāpāy/aābehiopx
pesarmadrese/aābehiopx
Pirniyā/aābehiopx
polisrāh/aābehiopx
porotokol/aābehiopx
pucgerā/aābehiopxycs
qābelehaml/aābehiopxycs
qahri/aābehiopxycs
qānunbandi/aābehiopx
qasir/aābehiopxycs
qermezrang/aābehiopxycs
qeyrekāšāni/aābehiopxycs
qeyretaxayyoli/aābehiopxycs
qonude/aābehiopx
rādiyoložist/aābehiopx
ramal/aābehiopx
rāsusānān/aābehiopx
reštan/aābehiopxnPV
rokni/aābehiopxycs
ruhiyebaxš/aābehiopxycs
šabestari/aābehiopx
Sadrā/aābehiopx
šāhdānegān/aābehiopx
sajdekonān/aābehiopx
šam'ak/aābehiopx
sangbārān/aābehiopxycs
sarāsimegi/aābehiopx
sarlašgari/aābehiopx
šast/aābehiopxCgO
sāzešnāpazir/aābehiopxycs
šekast/aābehiopx
sepāhi/aābehiopx
šetābgar/aābehiopx
šikāgo/aābehiopx
širxešt/aābehiopx
sobhgāh/aābehiopx
son'/aābehiopx
šowqi/aābehiopxycs
susmār/aābehiopx
Tabātabāyimaneš/aābehiopx
tafsirnašode/aābehiopxycs
tahzir/aābehiopx
tāksi/aābehiopx
tamāšāgari/aābehiopx
tanzālud/aābehiopxycs
taraqigerā/aābehiopxycs
tartibdahande/aābehiopxycs
tasviri/aābehiopxycs
ta'yini/aābehiopxycs
telexat/aābehiopx
Tisfun/aābehiopx
towhidi/aābehiopxycs
uftāde/aābehiopxycs
valāqeyr/aābehiopx
vasfnāšodani/aābehiopxycs
virusšenās/aābehiopxycs
xāki/aābehiopxycs
xānombāz/aābehiopxycs
xatarnāk/aābehiopxycs
xeyrāt/aābehiopx
xodsar/aābehiopxycs
xošdel/aābehiopxycs
xurdbin/aābehiopx
yediš/aābehiopx
Yunesi/aābehiopx
zamharir/aābehiopx
zarfiyatsāzi/aābehiopx
zeddesahyonisti/aābehiopxycs
zibide/aābehiopxycs
zomorrodin/aābehiopxycs
